Illinois, session 104th, HB3440.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 52-3.203 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.203)7    Sec. 2-3.203. Mental health screenings. 8    (a) On or before December 15, 2023, the State Board of 9Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 10Health Transformation Officer, Children's Behavioral Health 11Transformation Team in , and the Office of the Governor, shall 12file a report with the Governor and the General Assembly that 13includes recommendations for implementation of mental health 14screenings in schools for students enrolled in kindergarten 15through grade 12. This report must include a landscape scan of 16current district-wide screenings, recommendations for 17screening tools, training for staff, and linkage and referral 18for identified students.19    (b) On or before October 1, 2024, the State Board of 20Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 21Health Transformation Teamin , the Office of the Governor, and 22relevant stakeholders as needed shall release a strategy that 23includes a tool for measuring capacity and readiness to   HB3440- 2 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1implement universal mental health screening of students. The 2strategy shall build upon existing efforts to understand 3district needs for resources, technology, training, and 4infrastructure supports. The strategy shall include a 5framework for supporting districts in a phased approach to 6implement universal mental health screenings. The State Board 7of Education shall issue a report to the Governor and the 8General Assembly on school district readiness and plan for 9phased approach to universal mental health screening of 10students on or before April 1, 2025. 11    (c) On or before September 1, 2026, the State Board of 12Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 13Health Transformation Team in the Office of the Governor and 14relevant stakeholders, shall report its work and make 15available resource materials, including model policies and 16guidance informed by a phased approach to implementing 17universal mental health screening in schools. These model 18school district policies to facilitate the implementation of 19mental health screenings, shall include, but are not limited 20to, the option to opt-out, confidentiality and privacy 21considerations, communication with families and communities 22about the use of mental health screenings, data sharing, and 23storage of mental health screening results and plans for 24follow-up and linkage to resources after screenings. Guidance 25shall include (1) mental health screening tools available for 26school districts to use with students and (2) associated   HB3440- 3 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1training for school personnel. The State Board of Education 2shall make these resource materials available on its website. 3    (d) Mental health screenings shall be offered by school 4districts to students enrolled in kindergarten through grade 512, at least once a year, beginning with the 2027-2028 school 6year. A district may, by action of the State Board of 7Education, apply for an extension of the 2027-2028 school year 8implementation deadline if the school district meets criteria 9set by rule by the State Board of Education, which shall be 10based on the recommendations of the report issued in 11accordance with subsection (c). 12(Source: P.A. 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 13103-885, eff. 8-9-24.) 14    Section 10. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 15changing Section 5-5.23 as follows: 16    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.23)17    Sec. 5-5.23. Children's mental health services. 18    (a) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, by 19rule, shall require the screening and assessment of a child 20prior to any Medicaid-funded admission to an inpatient 21hospital for psychiatric services to be funded by Medicaid. 22The screening and assessment shall include a determination of 23the appropriateness and availability of out-patient support 24services for necessary treatment. The Department, by rule,   HB3440- 4 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1shall establish methods and standards of payment for the 2screening, assessment, and necessary alternative support 3services.4    (b) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, to 5the extent allowable under federal law, shall secure federal 6financial participation for Individual Care Grant expenditures 7made by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services for 8the Medicaid optional service authorized under Section 1905(h) 9of the federal Social Security Act, pursuant to the provisions 10of Section 7.1 of the Mental Health and Developmental 11Disabilities Administrative Act. The Department of Healthcare 12and Family Services may exercise the authority under this 13Section as is necessary to administer Individual Care Grants 14as authorized under Section 7.1 of the Mental Health and 15Developmental Disabilities Administrative Act. 16    (c) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 17work collaboratively with the Department of Children and 18Family Services and the Division of Mental Health of the 19Department of Human Services to implement subsections (a) and 20(b).21    (d) On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce 22any rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or 23alter any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any 24rate of reimbursement for services or other payments in 25accordance with Section 5-5e. 26    (e) All rights, powers, duties, and responsibilities   HB3440- 5 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1currently exercised by the Department of Human Services 2related to the Individual Care Grant program are transferred 3to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services with the 4transfer and transition of the Individual Care Grant program 5to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services to be 6completed and implemented within 6 months after the effective 7date of this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly. For 8the purposes of the Successor Agency Act, the Department of 9Healthcare and Family Services is declared to be the successor 10agency of the Department of Human Services, but only with 11respect to the functions of the Department of Human Services 12that are transferred to the Department of Healthcare and 13Family Services under this amendatory Act of the 99th General 14Assembly.15        (1) Each act done by the Department of Healthcare and 16    Family Services in exercise of the transferred powers, 17    duties, rights, and responsibilities shall have the same 18    legal effect as if done by the Department of Human 19    Services or its offices.20        (2) Any rules of the Department of Human Services that 21    relate to the functions and programs transferred by this 22    amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly that are in 23    full force on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 24    the 99th General Assembly shall become the rules of the 25    Department of Healthcare and Family Services. All rules 26    transferred under this amendatory Act of the 99th General   HB3440- 6 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1    Assembly are hereby amended such that the term 2    "Department" shall be defined as the Department of 3    Healthcare and Family Services and all references to the 4    "Secretary" shall be changed to the "Director of 5    Healthcare and Family Services or his or her designee". As 6    soon as practicable hereafter, the Department of 7    Healthcare and Family Services shall revise and clarify 8    the rules to reflect the transfer of rights, powers, 9    duties, and responsibilities affected by this amendatory 10    Act of the 99th General Assembly, using the procedures for 11    recodification of rules available under the Illinois 12    Administrative Procedure Act, except that existing title, 13    part, and section numbering for the affected rules may be 14    retained. The Department of Healthcare and Family 15    Services, consistent with its authority to do so as 16    granted by this amendatory Act of the 99th General 17    Assembly, shall propose and adopt any other rules under 18    the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to 19    administer the Individual Care Grant program. These rules 20    may include, but are not limited to, the application 21    process and eligibility requirements for recipients.22        (3) All unexpended appropriations and balances and 23    other funds available for use in connection with any 24    functions of the Individual Care Grant program shall be 25    transferred for the use of the Department of Healthcare 26    and Family Services to operate the Individual Care Grant   HB3440- 7 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1    program. Unexpended balances shall be expended only for 2    the purpose for which the appropriation was originally 3    made. The Department of Healthcare and Family Services 4    shall exercise all rights, powers, duties, and 5    responsibilities for operation of the Individual Care 6    Grant program.7        (4) Existing personnel and positions of the Department 8    of Human Services pertaining to the administration of the 9    Individual Care Grant program shall be transferred to the 10    Department of Healthcare and Family Services with the 11    transfer and transition of the Individual Care Grant 12    program to the Department of Healthcare and Family 13    Services. The status and rights of Department of Human 14    Services employees engaged in the performance of the 15    functions of the Individual Care Grant program shall not 16    be affected by this amendatory Act of the 99th General 17    Assembly. The rights of the employees, the State of 18    Illinois, and its agencies under the Personnel Code and 19    applicable collective bargaining agreements or under any 20    pension, retirement, or annuity plan shall not be affected 21    by this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly. All 22    transferred employees who are members of collective 23    bargaining units shall retain their seniority, continuous 24    service, salary, and accrued benefits.25        (5) All books, records, papers, documents, property 26    (real and personal), contracts, and pending business   HB3440- 8 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1    pertaining to the powers, duties, rights, and 2    responsibilities related to the functions of the 3    Individual Care Grant program, including, but not limited 4    to, material in electronic or magnetic format and 5    necessary computer hardware and software, shall be 6    delivered to the Department of Healthcare and Family 7    Services; provided, however, that the delivery of this 8    information shall not violate any applicable 9    confidentiality constraints.10        (6) Whenever reports or notices are now required to be 11    made or given or papers or documents furnished or served 12    by any person to or upon the Department of Human Services 13    in connection with any of the functions transferred by 14    this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly, the same 15    shall be made, given, furnished, or served in the same 16    manner to or upon the Department of Healthcare and Family 17    Services.18        (7) This amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly 19    shall not affect any act done, ratified, or canceled or 20    any right occurring or established or any action or 21    proceeding had or commenced in an administrative, civil, 22    or criminal cause regarding the Department of Human 23    Services before the effective date of this amendatory Act 24    of the 99th General Assembly; and those actions or 25    proceedings may be defended, prosecuted, and continued by 26    the Department of Human Services.  HB3440- 9 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1    (f) (Blank). 2    (g) Family Support Program. The Department of Healthcare 3and Family Services shall restructure the Family Support 4Program, formerly known as the Individual Care Grant program, 5to enable early treatment of youth, emerging adults, and 6transition-age adults with a serious mental illness or serious 7emotional disturbance.8        (1) As used in this subsection and in subsections (h) 9    through (s):10            (A) "Youth" means a person under the age of 18. 11            (B) "Emerging adult" means a person who is 18 12        through 20 years of age. 13            (C) "Transition-age adult" means a person who is 14        21 through 25 years of age. 15        (2) The Department shall amend 89 Ill. Adm. Code 139 16    in accordance with this Section and consistent with the 17    timelines outlined in this Section.18        (3) Implementation of any amended requirements shall 19    be completed within 8 months of the adoption of any 20    amendment to 89 Ill. Adm. Code 139 that is consistent with 21    the provisions of this Section. 22        (4) To align the Family Support Program with the 23    Medicaid system of care, the services available to a 24    youth, emerging adult, or transition-age adult through the 25    Family Support Program shall include all Medicaid 26    community-based mental health treatment services and all   HB3440- 10 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1    Family Support Program services included under 89 Ill. 2    Adm. Code 139. No person receiving services through the 3    Family Support Program or the Specialized Family Support 4    Program shall become a Medicaid enrollee unless Medicaid 5    eligibility criteria are met and the person is enrolled in 6    Medicaid. No part of this Section creates an entitlement 7    to services through the Family Support Program, the 8    Specialized Family Support Program, or the Medicaid 9    program. 10        (5) The Family Support Program shall align with the 11    following system of care principles: 12            (A) Treatment and support services shall be based 13        on the results of an integrated behavioral health 14        assessment and treatment plan using an instrument 15        approved by the Department of Healthcare and Family 16        Services.17            (B) Strong interagency collaboration between all 18        State agencies the parent or legal guardian is 19        involved with for services, including the Department 20        of Healthcare and Family Services, the Department of 21        Human Services, the Department of Children and Family 22        Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the 23        Illinois State Board of Education.24            (C) Individualized, strengths-based practices and 25        trauma-informed treatment approaches.26            (D) For a youth, full participation of the parent   HB3440- 11 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1        or legal guardian at all levels of treatment through a 2        process that is family-centered and youth-focused. The 3        process shall include consideration of the services 4        and supports the parent, legal guardian, or caregiver 5        requires for family stabilization, and shall connect 6        such person or persons to services based on available 7        insurance coverage. 8    (h) Eligibility for the Family Support Program. 9Eligibility criteria established under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 139 10for the Family Support Program shall include the following: 11        (1) Individuals applying to the program must be under 12    the age of 26. 13        (2) Requirements for parental or legal guardian 14    involvement are applicable to youth and to emerging adults 15    or transition-age adults who have a guardian appointed 16    under Article XIa of the Probate Act.17        (3) Youth, emerging adults, and transition-age adults 18    are eligible for services under the Family Support Program 19    upon their third inpatient admission to a hospital or 20    similar treatment facility for the primary purpose of 21    psychiatric treatment within the most recent 12 months and 22    are hospitalized for the purpose of psychiatric treatment.23        (4) School participation for emerging adults applying 24    for services under the Family Support Program may be 25    waived by request of the individual at the sole discretion 26    of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services.  HB3440- 12 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1        (5) School participation is not applicable to 2    transition-age adults. 3    (i) Notification of Family Support Program and Specialized 4Family Support Program services. 5        (1) Within 12 months after the effective date of this 6    amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, the 7    Department of Healthcare and Family Services, with 8    meaningful stakeholder input through a working group of 9    psychiatric hospitals, Family Support Program providers, 10    family support organizations, the Community and 11    Residential Services Authority, a statewide association 12    representing a majority of hospitals, a statewide 13    association representing physicians, and foster care 14    alumni advocates, shall establish a clear process by which 15    a youth's or emerging adult's parents, guardian, or 16    caregiver, or the emerging adult or transition-age adult, 17    is identified, notified, and educated about the Family 18    Support Program and the Specialized Family Support Program 19    upon a first psychiatric inpatient hospital admission, and 20    any following psychiatric inpatient admissions. 21    Notification and education may take place through a Family 22    Support Program coordinator, a mobile crisis response 23    provider, a Comprehensive Community Based Youth Services 24    provider, the Community and Residential Services 25    Authority, or any other designated provider or coordinator 26    identified by the Department of Healthcare and Family   HB3440- 13 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1    Services. In developing this process, the Department of 2    Healthcare and Family Services and the working group shall 3    take into account the unique needs of emerging adults and 4    transition-age adults without parental involvement who are 5    eligible for services under the Family Support Program. 6    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services and the 7    working group shall ensure the appropriate provider or 8    coordinator is required to assist individuals and their 9    parents, guardians, or caregivers, as applicable, in the 10    completion of the application or referral process for the 11    Family Support Program or the Specialized Family Support 12    Program. 13        (2) (Blank) Upon a youth's, emerging adult's or 14    transition-age adult's second psychiatric inpatient 15    hospital admission, prior to hospital discharge, the 16    hospital must, if it is aware of the patient's prior 17    psychiatric inpatient hospital admission, ensure that the 18    youth's parents, guardian, or caregiver, or the emerging 19    adult or transition-age adult, has been notified of the 20    Family Support Program and the Specialized Family Support 21    Program. 22        (3) Psychiatric lockout as last resort. 23            (A) Prior to referring any youth to the Department 24        of Children and Family Services for the filing of a 25        petition in accordance with subparagraph (c) of 26        paragraph (1) of Section 2-4 of the Juvenile Court Act   HB3440- 14 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1        of 1987 alleging that the youth is dependent because 2        the youth was left in a psychiatric hospital beyond 3        medical necessity, the hospital shall attempt to 4        contact the youth and the youth's parents, guardian, 5        or caregiver about the BEACON portal and Family 6        Support Program and the Specialized Family Support 7        Program and shall assist with connections to the 8        designated Family Support Program coordinator in the 9        service area by providing educational materials 10        developed by the Department of Healthcare and Family 11        Services. Once this process has begun, any such youth 12        shall be considered a youth for whom an application 13        for the Family Support Program is pending with the 14        Department of Healthcare and Family Services or an 15        active application for the Family Support Program was 16        being reviewed by the Department for the purposes of 17        subsection (a) of Section 2-4b of the Juvenile Court 18        Act of 1987, or for the purposes of subsection (a) of 19        Section 5-711 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 20            (B) No state agency or hospital shall coach a 21        parent or guardian of a youth in a psychiatric 22        hospital inpatient unit to lock out or otherwise 23        relinquish custody of a youth to the Department of 24        Children and Family Services for the sole purpose of 25        obtaining necessary mental health treatment for the 26        youth. In the absence of abuse or neglect, a   HB3440- 15 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1        psychiatric lockout or custody relinquishment to the 2        Department of Children and Family Services shall only 3        be considered as the option of last resort. Nothing in 4        this Section shall prohibit discussion of medical 5        treatment options or a referral to legal counsel. 6        (4) Development of new Family Support Program 7    services. 8            (A) Development of specialized therapeutic 9        residential treatment for youth and emerging adults 10        with high-acuity mental health conditions. Through a 11        working group led by the Department of Healthcare and 12        Family Services that includes the Department of 13        Children and Family Services and residential treatment 14        providers for youth and emerging adults, the 15        Department of Healthcare and Family Services, within 16        12 months after the effective date of this amendatory 17        Act of the 101st General Assembly, shall develop a 18        plan for the development of specialized therapeutic 19        residential treatment beds similar to a qualified 20        residential treatment program, as defined in the 21        federal Family First Prevention Services Act, for 22        youth in the Family Support Program with high-acuity 23        mental health needs. The Department of Healthcare and 24        Family Services and the Department of Children and 25        Family Services shall work together to maximize 26        federal funding through Medicaid and Title IV-E of the   HB3440- 16 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1        Social Security Act in the development and 2        implementation of this plan.3            (B) Using the Department of Children and Family 4        Services' beyond medical necessity data over the last 5        5 years and any other relevant, available data, the 6        Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 7        assess the estimated number of these specialized 8        high-acuity residential treatment beds that are needed 9        in each region of the State based on the number of 10        youth remaining in psychiatric hospitals beyond 11        medical necessity and the number of youth placed 12        out-of-state who need this level of care. The 13        Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 14        report the results of this assessment to the General 15        Assembly by no later than December 31, 2020. 16            (C) Development of an age-appropriate therapeutic 17        residential treatment model for emerging adults and 18        transition-age adults. Within 30 months after the 19        effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 20        General Assembly, the Department of Healthcare and 21        Family Services, in partnership with the Department of 22        Human Services' Division of Mental Health and with 23        significant and meaningful stakeholder input through a 24        working group of providers and other stakeholders, 25        shall develop a supportive housing model for emerging 26        adults and transition-age adults receiving services   HB3440- 17 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1        through the Family Support Program who need 2        residential treatment and support to enable recovery. 3        Such a model shall be age-appropriate and shall allow 4        the residential component of the model to be in a 5        community-based setting combined with intensive 6        community-based mental health services. 7    (j) Workgroup to develop a plan for improving access to 8substance use treatment. The Department of Healthcare and 9Family Services and the Department of Human Services' Division 10of Substance Use Prevention and Recovery shall co-lead a 11working group that includes Family Support Program providers, 12family support organizations, and other stakeholders over a 1312-month period beginning in the first quarter of calendar 14year 2020 to develop a plan for increasing access to substance 15use treatment services for youth, emerging adults, and 16transition-age adults who are eligible for Family Support 17Program services. 18    (k) Appropriation. Implementation of this Section shall be 19limited by the State's annual appropriation to the Family 20Support Program. Spending within the Family Support Program 21appropriation shall be further limited for the new Family 22Support Program services to be developed accordingly:23        (1) Targeted use of specialized therapeutic 24    residential treatment for youth and emerging adults with 25    high-acuity mental health conditions through appropriation 26    limitation. No more than 12% of all annual Family Support   HB3440- 18 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1    Program funds shall be spent on this level of care in any 2    given state fiscal year. 3        (2) Targeted use of residential treatment model 4    established for emerging adults and transition-age adults 5    through appropriation limitation. No more than one-quarter 6    of all annual Family Support Program funds shall be spent 7    on this level of care in any given state fiscal year. 8    (l) Exhausting third party insurance coverage first. 9        (A) A parent, legal guardian, emerging adult, or 10    transition-age adult with private insurance coverage shall 11    work with the Department of Healthcare and Family 12    Services, or its designee, to identify insurance coverage 13    for any and all benefits covered by their plan. If 14    insurance cost-sharing by any method for treatment is 15    cost-prohibitive for the parent, legal guardian, emerging 16    adult, or transition-age adult, Family Support Program 17    funds may be applied as a payer of last resort toward 18    insurance cost-sharing for purposes of using private 19    insurance coverage to the fullest extent for the 20    recommended treatment. If the Department, or its agent, 21    has a concern relating to the parent's, legal guardian's, 22    emerging adult's, or transition-age adult's insurer's 23    compliance with Illinois or federal insurance requirements 24    relating to the coverage of mental health or substance use 25    disorders, it shall refer all relevant information to the 26    applicable regulatory authority.   HB3440- 19 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1        (B) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services 2    shall use Medicaid funds first for an individual who has 3    Medicaid coverage if the treatment or service recommended 4    using an integrated behavioral health assessment and 5    treatment plan (using the instrument approved by the 6    Department of Healthcare and Family Services) is covered 7    by Medicaid. 8        (C) If private or public insurance coverage does not 9    cover the needed treatment or service, Family Support 10    Program funds shall be used to cover the services offered 11    through the Family Support Program. 12    (m) Service authorization. A youth, emerging adult, or 13transition-age adult enrolled in the Family Support Program or 14the Specialized Family Support Program shall be eligible to 15receive a mental health treatment service covered by the 16applicable program if the medical necessity criteria 17established by the Department of Healthcare and Family 18Services are met. 19    (n) Streamlined application. The Department of Healthcare 20and Family Services shall revise the Family Support Program 21applications and the application process to reflect the 22changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 23101st General Assembly within 8 months after the adoption of 24any amendments to 89 Ill. Adm. Code 139. 25    (o) Study of reimbursement policies during planned and 26unplanned absences of youth and emerging adults in Family   HB3440- 20 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1Support Program residential treatment settings. The Department 2of Healthcare and Family Services shall undertake a study of 3those standards of the Department of Children and Family 4Services and other states for reimbursement of residential 5treatment during planned and unplanned absences to determine 6if reimbursing residential providers for such unplanned 7absences positively impacts the availability of residential 8treatment for youth and emerging adults. The Department of 9Healthcare and Family Services shall begin the study on July 101, 2019 and shall report its findings and the results of the 11study to the General Assembly, along with any recommendations 12for or against adopting a similar policy, by December 31, 132020. 14    (p) Public awareness and educational campaign for all 15relevant providers. The Department of Healthcare and Family 16Services shall engage in a public awareness campaign to 17educate hospitals with psychiatric units, crisis response 18providers such as Screening, Assessment and Support Services 19providers and Comprehensive Community Based Youth Services 20agencies, schools, and other community institutions and 21providers across Illinois on the changes made by this 22amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly to the Family 23Support Program. The Department of Healthcare and Family 24Services shall produce written materials geared for the 25appropriate target audience, develop webinars, and conduct 26outreach visits over a 12-month period beginning after   HB3440- 21 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 2amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. 3    (q) Maximizing federal matching funds for the Family 4Support Program and the Specialized Family Support Program. 5The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, as the sole 6Medicaid State agency, shall seek approval from the federal 7Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services within 12 months 8after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 9General Assembly to draw additional federal Medicaid matching 10funds for individuals served under the Family Support Program 11or the Specialized Family Support Program who are not covered 12by the Department's medical assistance programs. The 13Department of Children and Family Services, as the State 14agency responsible for administering federal funds pursuant to 15Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, shall submit a State 16Plan to the federal government within 12 months after the 17effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 18Assembly to maximize the use of federal Title IV-E prevention 19funds through the federal Family First Prevention Services 20Act, to provide mental health and substance use disorder 21treatment services and supports, including, but not limited 22to, the provision of short-term crisis and transition beds 23post-hospitalization for youth who are at imminent risk of 24entering Illinois' youth welfare system solely due to the 25inability to access mental health or substance use treatment 26services.   HB3440- 22 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1    (r) Outcomes and data reported annually to the General 2Assembly. Beginning in 2021, the Department of Healthcare and 3Family Services shall submit an annual report to the General 4Assembly that includes the following information with respect 5to the time period covered by the report:6        (1) The number and ages of youth, emerging adults, and 7    transition-age adults who requested services under the 8    Family Support Program and the Specialized Family Support 9    Program and the services received. 10        (2) The number and ages of youth, emerging adults, and 11    transition-age adults who requested services under the 12    Specialized Family Support Program who were eligible for 13    services based on the number of hospitalizations. 14        (3) The number and ages of youth, emerging adults, and 15    transition-age adults who applied for Family Support 16    Program or Specialized Family Support Program services but 17    did not receive any services. 18    (s) Rulemaking authority. Unless a timeline is otherwise 19specified in a subsection, if amendments to 89 Ill. Adm. Code 20139 are needed for implementation of this Section, such 21amendments shall be filed by the Department of Healthcare and 22Family Services within one year after the effective date of 23this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly.24(Source: P.A. 101-461, eff. 1-1-20; 101-616, eff. 12-20-19.) 25    Section 15. The Interagency Children's Behavioral Health   HB3440- 23 -LRB104 11208 KTG 21290 b1Services Act is amended by adding Section 35 as follows: 2    (405 ILCS 165/35 new)3    Sec. 35. BEACON Training. The Department of Human 4Services, in coordination with a statewide association 5representing a majority of hospitals, shall establish and 6offer a voluntary training that will be recorded and made 7available on the Department's website to all hospital social 8workers, clinicians, and administrative staff to inform them 9of BEACON, a centralized resource for Illinois youth and 10families seeking services for behavioral health needs, with 11the goal of encouraging families to seek assistance through 12BEACON and the Interagency Children's Behavioral Health 13Services Team. The training shall include how families and 14hospital staff can access BEACON, the process once a case is 15entered into BEACON, and State and community programs 16accessible through BEACON.